Utah statutes.
64-13a-10.   Payment of accounts.
All accounts payable by Utah correctional industries shall be preaudited by a
person designated by the Utah Correctional Industries Division. Requisitions
for payment of accounts shall be signed and countersigned by persons
designated by the Utah Correctional Industries Division.
